Massachusetts, session 194th, S112.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
The General Laws are hereby amended by inserting after chapter 220 the following 
chapter:-   
CHAPTER 220A   
MASSACHUSETTS CHILDREN’S ALLIANCE   
Section 1. As used in this chapter the following words shall, unless the context clearly 
requires otherwise, have the following meanings:-    
"Accreditation", the process in which certification of competency, authority, or credibility 
is presented by national or state level standards to ensure effective, efficient and consistent 
delivery of services by a children’s advocacy center.   
“Alliance”, Massachusetts Children’s Alliance.   

of 5 11  "Children's Advocacy Center", a child-focused, trauma-informed, facility-based program 
in which a multidisciplinary team with representatives from law enforcement, child protection, 
prosecution, mental health, forensic interviewing, medical, and victim advocacy disciplines 
collaborate to offer the best response to child victims of maltreatment. Children advocacy centers 
assist in the response to allegations of child sexual abuse, severe physical abuse and exploitation 
of children. The multidisciplinary team collaborates to interview children, meet with a child's 
non-offending parents, guardians, caregivers, and family members, and to coordinate a 
streamlined, victim-focused response including investigation and provision of necessary services 
to ensure children can heal. A children’s advocacy center response facilitates efficient collection 
and sharing of information, improves timely evidence gathering, enhances communication 
among agencies involved, and broadens the knowledge base from which protective and 
investigative decisions are made. Children’s advocacy centers may be private nonprofit 
organizations or based within hospitals, district attorney’s offices, or other governmental entities.    
“Center,” Children’s Advocacy Center.   
"Forensic interview", an interview of a child victim of maltreatment by a forensic 
interviewer who meets or exceeds national training standards.  Forensic interviews are conducted 
in an unbiased, developmentally appropriate, culturally sensitive, and fact-finding manner to 
obtain accurate information and support the best outcome for children. Whenever practical, 
members of the multidisciplinary team involved in the response shall observe the interview, 
which shall be electronically recorded.   
"Massachusetts Children’s Alliance", the statewide membership organization that serves 
as a funding source to ensure children’s advocacy centers have the necessary fiscal resources to 

of 5 33 properly and effectively respond to child victims. The alliance engages member children’s 
advocacy centers in an accreditation process which meets or exceeds standards set by the 
national children’s alliance, by collecting and sharing of data, and by providing training, 
leadership, and technical assistance to existing and emerging children’s advocacy centers in the 
commonwealth. The alliance ensures through contractual relationship that children’s advocacy 
centers meet or exceed national standards for operating and these standards shall include:   
1. multidisciplinary teams that include representation from law enforcement, prosecutors, 
child protective services, the medical and mental health fields, and victim advocacy;   
2. services that are cultural sensitivity and able to meet the needs of the diverse 
population of the commonwealth;   
3. forensic interviews that are neutral, fact-finding, and avoid duplicative interviewing;   
4. victim support and advocacy for children and caregivers, including appropriate 
counseling, legal, and medical services or referrals;   
5. access to medical evaluations;   
6. access to mental health services;   
7. a formal case review process;   
8. a case tracking, monitoring, and outcomes process;   
9. organizational capacity;   
10. a child-focused setting that is comfortable, safe, and private; and   

of 5 52  11. any additional necessary standards.   
"Multidisciplinary team”, a group of professionals working collaboratively under a 
written protocol, who represent various disciplines to assure the most effective and coordinated 
response to child maltreatment for every child. A children’s advocacy center’s multidisciplinary 
team shall include professionals involved in the coordination, assessment, investigation, and 
prosecution of child abuse cases, including the children advocacy center’s staff, participating law 
enforcement agencies, the district attorney, and the department of children and families. A 
multidisciplinary team shall include professionals involved in the delivery of services, including 
medical and mental health services, to victims of child maltreatment and their non-offending 
family members.   
"National Children's Alliance", the national, professional membership organization that 
provides standards for accreditation of children’s advocacy centers and is dedicated to helping 
local communities respond to allegations of child abuse in an effective and efficient manner.   
Section 2. There is hereby created a body politic and corporate to be known as the 
Massachusetts Children’s Alliance for the purpose of providing leadership, innovative 
programming, training, technical assistance, data collection, and capacity building to meet local, 
state, and national requirements for children’s advocacy centers. The alliance may contract with 
state and federal entities to ensure that children’s advocacy centers are equipped to meet the 
needs of child victims of abuse. The alliance may receive and disburse any funds, grants, and 
services in furtherance of its functions.    
Section 3. Children’s advocacy centers shall provide a formal, integrated, culturally 
competent and multidisciplinary response to child maltreatment for the benefit of children and 

of 5 74 their non-offending family members. The centers shall expedite a streamlined process by means 
of a prompt, coordinated, child focused, fact finding forensic multidisciplinary team interview 
and assessment which obtains the information required by involved agencies and ensures 
children are not further traumatized by the systems intended to aid. Moreover, this collaborative 
process shall ensure that professionals have the necessary information to provide services in the 
best interest of the child. The centers shall offer comprehensive services to address the mental 
health and medical needs of children. The centers shall continuously work towards the 
improvement of prevention strategies and intervention responses.